Missouri, session 2026, HB2607.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.115, 137.180, 137.355, 138.060, 138.135, 138.434, and
139.031, RSMo, are repealed and eight new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 137.115, 137.132, 137.180, 137.355, 138.060, 138.135, 138.434, and 139.031, to
read as follows:
137.115. 1. (1) All other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the assessor or the
assessor's deputies in all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis shall annually
make a list of all real and tangible personal property taxable in the assessor's city, county,
town or district.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section and section 137.078,
the assessor shall annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and one-third percent of
its true value in money as of January first of each calendar year.
(3) The assessor shall annually assess all real property, including any new
construction and improvements to real property, and possessory interests in real property at
the percent of its true value in money set in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in
money of any possessory interest in real property in subclass (3), where such real property is
on or lies within the ultimate airport boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as
defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a FAR Part 139 certification and
owned by a political subdivision, shall be the otherwise applicable true value in money of any
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2607 2
such possessory interest in real property, less the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party,
other than the political subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on such
real property completed after January 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-
mentioned possessory interest, regardless of the year in which such costs were incurred or
whether such costs were considered in any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all
real property in the following manner: new assessed values shall be determined as of January
first of each odd-numbered year and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered year, except for new construction
and property improvements which shall be valued as though they had been completed as of
January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The assessor may call at the office, place
of doing business, or residence of each person required by this chapter to list property, and
require the person to make a correct statement of all taxable tangible personal property owned
by the person or under his or her care, charge or management, taxable in the county.
(4) On or before January first of each even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare
and submit a two-year assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and the
state tax commission for their respective approval or modification. The county governing
body shall approve and forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the state tax
commission by February first. If the county governing body fails to forward the plan or its
alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by February first, the assessor's plan shall
be considered approved by the county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to
approve a plan and if the state tax commission and the assessor and the governing body of the
county involved are unable to resolve the differences, in order to receive state cost-share
funds outlined in section 137.750, the county or the assessor shall petition the administrative
hearing commission, by May first, to decide all matters in dispute regarding the assessment
maintenance plan. Upon agreement of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties
proceed with mediation or arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final decision
of the administrative hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in the circuit
court of the county involved.
(5) In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real property within any county with a
charter form of government, or within a city not within a county, is made by a computer,
computer-assisted method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported by clear,
convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the assessor at any
hearing or appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
presumption that the assessment was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a
computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
[(1)] (a) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal of the property by
generally accepted appraisal techniques; and

HB 2607 3
[(2)] (b) The purchase prices from sales of at least three comparable properties and
the address or location thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
that:
[(a)] a. Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the property valuation; and
[(b)] b. Such properties are not more than one mile from the site of the disputed
property, except where no similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such property shall be within five hundred
square feet in size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in age, floor
plan, number of rooms, and other relevant characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City of St. Louis may send personal
property assessment forms through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each constitute separate subclasses
of tangible personal property and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of taxation at
the following percentages of their true value in money:
(1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an unmanufactured condition, one-half of
one percent;
(2) Livestock, twelve percent;
(3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
(4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration as and are registered as historic
motor vehicles pursuant to section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five years
old and which are used solely for noncommercial purposes and are operated less than two
hundred hours per year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five percent;
(5) Poultry, twelve percent;
(6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and tools and equipment used in
retooling for the purpose of introducing new product lines or used for making improvements
to existing products by any company which is located in a state enterprise zone and which is
identified by any standard industrial classification number cited in subdivision (7) of section
135.200, twenty-five percent; and
(7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and related solar equipment, components,
materials, and supplies installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy systems, as
described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of section 144.030, that were constructed and
producing solar energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
4. The person listing the property shall enter a true and correct statement of the
property, in a printed blank prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being filled out,
shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to as provided in section 137.155. The list shall
then be delivered to the assessor.

HB 2607 4
5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such subclasses are established in Section 4
(b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016, shall be assessed
at the following percentages of true value:
(a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen percent;
(b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent; and
(c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two percent.
(2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or, if not located within a county,
then the assessor of such city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real property if the use
or purpose of such real property is changed after such property is assessed under the
provisions of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such property shall be reclassified,
he or she shall determine the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage of the
tax year that such property was classified in each subclassification.
100 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010, which are actually used as
101 dwelling units shall be assessed at the same percentage of true value as residential real
102 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of assessment of true value for such
103 manufactured homes shall be the same as for residential real property. If the county collector
104 cannot identify or find the manufactured home when attempting to attach the manufactured
105 home for payment of taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county collector may
106 request the county commission to have the manufactured home removed from the tax books,
107 and such request shall be granted within thirty days after the request is made; however, the
108 removal from the tax books does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it is
109 later identified or found. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home located in a
110 manufactured home rental park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
111 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal property. For purposes of this
112 section, a manufactured home located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
113 may be considered real property.
114 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered a parcel for the purpose of
115 reimbursement pursuant to section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to be
116 real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015 and assessed as a realty improvement
117 to the existing real estate parcel.
118 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the assessment of a manufactured
119 home shall be included on the personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
120 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of
121 section 442.015, in which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment of the
122 manufactured home as a realty improvement to the existing real estate parcel shall be
123 included on the real property tax statement of the real estate owner.

HB 2607 5
124 9. The assessor of each county and each city not within a county shall use a nationally
125 recognized automotive trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
126 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book, Edmunds, or other similar
127 publication as the recommended guide of information for determining the true value of motor
128 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax commission shall select and make
129 available to all assessors which publication shall be used. The assessor of each county and
130 each city not within a county shall use the trade-in value published in the current October
131 issue of the publication selected by the state tax commission. The assessor shall not use a
132 value that is greater than the average trade-in value in determining the true value of the motor
133 vehicle without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years
134 old or newer from a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other than average
135 without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for
136 a particular motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use such information or
137 publications that, in the assessor's judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
138 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of less than fifty thousand dollars as
139 of January 1, 2025, the assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount greater
140 than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous year, provided that such motor vehicle
141 was properly assessed in the previous year.
142 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed valuation of any parcel of subclass
143 (1) real property by more than fifteen percent since the last assessment, excluding increases
144 due to new construction or improvements, the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of
145 such property.
146 11. If a physical inspection is required[,] pursuant to subsection 10 of this section, the
147 assessor shall notify the property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the owner
148 clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
149 inspection is required, the property owner may request that an interior inspection be
150 performed during the physical inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days prior
151 to the physical inspection to notify the assessor of a request for an interior physical
152 inspection.
153 12. A physical inspection[, as] required by subsection 10 of this section[,] shall be
154 completed prior to July first of the reassessment year and shallinclude, but not be limited
155 to, an on-site personal observation and review of all exterior portions of the land and any
156 buildings and improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably and lawfully gain
157 external access, and shall include an observation and review of the interior of any buildings or
158 improvements on the property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant to subsection 11
159 of this section. Mere observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or the like shall not
160 be considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as required by this section.

HB 2607 6
161 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards as proper form of payment of
162 outstanding property tax or license due. No county or city collector may charge surcharge for
163 payment by credit card which exceeds the fee or surcharge charged by the credit card bank,
164 processor, or issuer for its service. A county or city collector may accept payment by
165 electronic transfers of funds in payment of any tax or license and charge the person making
166 such payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the bank, processor, or issuer of
167 such electronic payment.
168 14. Any county or city not within a county in this state may, by an affirmative vote of
169 the governing body of such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and sections
170 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
171 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house committee
172 substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-
173 second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of the general
174 reassessment, prior to January first of any year. No county or city not within a county
175 shall exercise this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of this section and
176 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first
177 general assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
178 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no.
179 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a year of general
180 reassessment. For the purposes of applying the provisions of this subsection, a political
181 subdivision contained within two or more counties where at least one of such counties has
182 opted out and at least one of such counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate as
183 in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly,
184 second regular session. A governing body of a city not within a county or a county that has
185 opted out under the provisions of this subsection may choose to implement the provisions of
186 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of
187 the ninety-first general assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as modified by
188 house committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill
189 no. 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of general
190 reassessment, by an affirmative vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
191 any year.
192 15. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than twenty-
193 six thousand three hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred inhabitants
194 located in any county that has exercised its authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this
195 section may levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal property only if such
196 city bills and collects its own property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing and

HB 2607 7
197 collection of such separate and differing tax rates. Such separate and differing rates shall not
198 exceed such city's tax rate ceiling.
199 16. Any portion of real property that is available as reserve for strip, surface, or coal
200 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that has not
201 been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be assessed based upon how the real
202 property is currently being used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state tax
203 commission, state agency, or political subdivision responsible for the administration of tax
204 policies shall, in the performance of its duties, make available all books, records, and
205 information requested, except such books, records, and information as are by law declared
206 confidential in nature, including individually identifiable information regarding a specific
207 taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property. For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall
208 mean all real property that is in use or readily available as a reserve for strip, surface, or coal
209 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to others that
210 has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.132. 1. For the purposes of this section, and in any appeal alleging a
violation thereof, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Common level of assessment", the ratio of the total of the assessor's assessed
values for all real property in a subclass, as verified under section 137.245, to the total of
actual true values in money of the same real property, expressed as a percentage, and
measured by an assessment ratio study;
(2) "Individual level of assessment", the ratio of an assessor's assessed value for
an individual parcel of real property, as verified under section 137.245, to the actual true
value in money of such real property, expressed as a percentage.
2. The level of assessment of all real property in subclass (1) or subclass (3), as
provided in section 137.115, shall be uniform and equal throughout each subclass. If the
common level of assessment in either subclass is lower than the individual level of
assessment of any parcel in the same subclass, the individual level of assessment of such
parcel shall be lowered to the common level of assessment for the subclass upon appeal
by the property owner to the local board of equalization, state tax commission, or circuit
court.
3. When determining the individual level of assessment of a parcel of real
property, the lesser of the assessor's appraised value, as verified under section 137.245,
or the appraised value set by the local board of equalization shall be presumed to be the
actual true value in money for such real property, absent substantial and persuasive
evidence establishing a lower true value in money.
137.180. 1. Whenever any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property
he shall forthwith notify the record owner of such increase, either in person, or by mail

HB 2607 8
directed to the last known address; every such increase in assessed valuation made by the
assessor shall be subject to review by the county board of equalization whereat the landowner
shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner shall so state.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, for all counties with a charter form of government, other
than any county adopting a charter form of government after January 1, 2008, whenever any
assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year of general
reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of the projected tax liability likely to
result from such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed to the last known address;
every such increase in assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the
notice to the landowner shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from the county
shall accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.
3. For all calendar years prior to the first day of January of the year following receipt
of software necessary for the implementation of the requirements provided under subsections
4 and 5 of this section from the state tax commission, for any county not subject to the
provisions of subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever any
assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of the previous assessed value and such increase
either in person, or by mail directed to the last known address and include in such notice a
statement indicating that the change in assessed value may impact the record owner's tax
liability and provide all processes and deadlines for appealing determinations of the assessed
value of such property. Such notice shall be provided in a font and format sufficient to alert a
record owner of the potential impact upon tax liability and the appellate processes available.
4. Effective January first of the year following receipt of software necessary for the
implementation of the requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 5 of this
section from the state tax commission, for all counties not subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever any assessor shall
increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year of general reassessment, the county
shall notify the record owner of the projected tax liability likely to result from such an
increase, either in person, or by mail directed to the last known address; every such increase
in assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by the county board of
equalization whereat the landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the
landowner shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from the county shall
accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.

HB 2607 9
5. The notice of projected tax liability, required under subsections 2 and 4 of this
section, from the county shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual tax levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates for political subdivisions levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided by the
political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the taxpayer.
6. In addition to the requirements provided under subsections 1, 2, and 5 of this
section, effective January 1, 2011, in any county with a charter form of government and with
more than one million inhabitants, whenever any assessor shall notify a record owner of any
change in assessed value, such assessor shall provide notice that information regarding the
specific assessment method and the basis of the computation of value for such property is
available on the assessor's website and provide the exact website address at which such
information may be accessed. Such notification shall provide the assessor's contact
information to enable taxpayers without internet access to request and receive information
regarding the assessment method and computation of value for such property. If any third-
party documents, reports, or other data were relied upon by the assessor in the
computation of assessed value, the same shall be disclosed to the record owner on the
assessor's website.
137.355. 1. If an assessor increases the valuation of any tangible personal property as
estimated in the itemized list furnished to the assessor, and if an assessor increases the
valuation of any real property, he shall forthwith notify the record owner of the increase either
in person or by mail directed to the last known address, and if the address of the owner is
unknown notice shall be given by publication in two newspapers published in the county.
2. For all calendar years prior to the first day of January of the year following receipt
of software necessary for the implementation of the requirements provided under subsections
3 and 4 of this section from the state tax commission, whenever any assessor shall increase

HB 2607 10
the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner on or
before June fifteenth of the previous assessed value and such increase either in person, or by
mail directed to the last known address and include on the face of such notice, in no less than
twelve-point font, the following statement:
NOTICE TO TAXPAYER: IF YOUR ASSESSED VALUE HAS INCREASED, IT
MAY INCREASE YOUR REAL PROPERTY TAXES WHICH ARE DUE DECEMBER
THIRTY-FIRST. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE THAT THE VALUE OF YOUR PROPERTY
HAS INCREASED, YOU MUST CHALLENGE THE VALUE ON OR BEFORE ______
(INSERT DATE BY WHICH APPEAL MUST BE FILED) BY CONTACTING YOUR
COUNTY ASSESSOR.
3. Effective January first of the year following receipt of software necessary for the
implementation of the requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 4 of this
section from the state tax commission, if an assessor increases the valuation of any real
property, the assessor, on or before June fifteenth, shall notify the record owner of the
increase and, in a year of general reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of the
projected tax liability likely to result from such an increase either in person or by mail
directed to the last known address, and, if the address of the owner is unknown, notice shall
be given by publication in two newspapers published in the county. Notice of the projected
tax liability from the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation from the
assessor.
4. The notice of projected tax liability, required under subsection 3 of this section,
from the county shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual tax levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates for political subdivisions levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided by the
political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the taxpayer.

HB 2607 11
5. Whenever any assessor shall notify a record owner of any increase in assessed
value as required by subsection 3 of this section, such assessor shall provide notice that
information regarding the specific assessment method and the basis of the computation
of value for such property is available on the assessor's website and shall provide the
exact website address at which such information may be accessed. Such notification
shall provide the assessor's contact information to enable taxpayers without internet
access to request and receive information regarding the assessment method and
computation of value for such taxpayers' property. If any third-party documents,
reports, or other data were relied upon by the assessor in the computation of assessed
value, the same shall be disclosed to the record owner on the assessor's website.
138.060. 1. The county board of equalization shall, in a summary way, determine all
appeals from the valuation of property made by the assessor, and shall correct and adjust the
assessment accordingly. There shall be no presumption that the assessor's valuation is
correct. In any county with a charter form of government with a population greater than two
hundred eighty thousand inhabitants but less than two hundred eighty-five thousand
inhabitants, in any county with a charter form of government with greater than one million
inhabitants, in any city not within a county, and in any other county for any property whose
assessed valuation increased at least fifteen percent from the previous assessment unless the
increase is due to new construction or improvement, the assessor shall have the burden to
prove that the assessor's valuation does not exceed the true market value of the subject
property. In such county or city, in the event a physical inspection of the subject property is
required by subsection 10 of section 137.115, the assessor shall have the burden to establish
the manner in which the physical inspection was performed and shall have the burden to
prove that the physical inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115. In such
county or city, in the event the assessor fails to provide sufficient evidence to establish that
the physical inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115, the property
owner shall prevail on the appeal as a matter of law, and the assessor's increased assessed
valuation shall be void in its entirety, and the previous assessed valuation shall be
applied to the property in place of the increased assessed valuation. At any hearing
before the state tax commission or a court of competent jurisdiction of an appeal of
assessment from a first class charter county or a city not within a county, the assessor shall not
advocate nor present evidence advocating a valuation higher than that value finally
determined by the assessor or the value determined by the board of equalization, whichever is
higher, for that assessment period.
2. The county clerk shall keep an accurate record of the proceedings and orders of the
board, and the assessor shall correct all erroneous assessments, and the clerk shall adjust the
tax book according to the orders of such board and the orders of the state tax commission,

HB 2607 12
except that in adding or deducting such percent to each tract or parcel of real estate as
required by such board or state tax commission, he shall add or deduct in each case any
fractional sum of less than fifty cents, so that the value of any separate tract shall contain no
fractions of a dollar.
138.135. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the county
assessor of any county of the first classification with a population of at least nine hundred
thousand inhabitants shall not be a member of the county board of equalization.
2. In any county of the first classification with a population of at least nine hundred
thousand inhabitants, when there is an order of the board of equalization or the state tax
commission, including a settlement order, relating to the assessment of property, the
assessment shall remain the same for the subsequent even-numbered year unless there has
been new construction or property improvements between January first of the odd-numbered
year and January first of the following even-numbered year. However, in the event of a
transfer of ownership of real property on or after January first of an even-numbered
year, the new owner shall be entitled to appeal the assessed value directly to the state tax
commission by no later than December thirty-first of the same year, even if the prior
owner appealed the value in the previous odd-numbered year and the appeal resulted in
an order of the board of equalization or state tax commission. In any such appeal by a
new owner, the state tax commission shall have authority to lower the assessed value for
the even-numbered year.
3. In any county of the first classification with a population of at least nine hundred
thousand inhabitants, when a hearing is conducted by the board of equalization pursuant to
this chapter, if the property owner requests to be heard by a majority of the board of
equalization, and a majority of the board of equalization is not in attendance for any reason,
the position of the property owner shall prevail without further action.
138.434. In any [first class] charter county or a city not within a county [may require
by ordinance or charter the reimbursement to], a taxpayer [for the amount of just and
reasonable appraisal costs, attorney fees and court costs] shall be entitled to an award of all
attorney's fees and costs of litigation resulting from an evidentiary hearing before the state
tax commission or a court of competent jurisdiction including, but not limited to, attorney's
fees, appraisal costs, witness fees, and court costs, whether paid directly by the taxpayer
or paid by an attorney, tax agent, or other third party, if such appeal results in a final
decision reducing the appraised value of residential property by at least fifteen percent or the
appraised value of utility, industrial railroad and other subclass three property by at least
twenty-five percent from the appraised value determined by the board of equalization for that
tax year. The commission or court awarding such fees and costs shall consider the
reasonableness of the fees and costs within the context of the particular case. Such fees and

HB 2607 13
costs shall not exceed [one] five thousand dollars for a residential property appeal. Such fees
and costs for utility, industrial railroad or other subclass three property appeals shall not
exceed the lesser of [four] five thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the tax savings
resulting from the appeal. The provisions of this section shall only apply to the first contested
year when cases are tried on a consolidated basis.
139.031. 1. Any taxpayer may protest all or any part of any current taxes assessed
against the taxpayer, except taxes collected by the director of revenue of Missouri. Any such
taxpayer desiring to pay any current taxes under protest or while paying taxes based upon a
disputed assessment shall[, at the time of paying such taxes,] make full payment of the current
tax bill before the delinquency date and file with the collector before the delinquency date a
written statement setting forth the grounds on which the protest is based. The statement shall
include the true value in money claimed by the taxpayer if disputed. An appeal before the
state tax commission shall not be dismissed on the grounds that a taxpayer failed to file a
written statement when paying taxes based upon a disputed assessment.
2. Upon receiving [payment of current taxes under] written notice of protest under
subsection 1 of this section or upon receiving from the state tax commission or the circuit
court notice of an appeal from the state tax commission or the circuit court under section
138.430, [along with] andfull payment of the current tax bill before the delinquency date, the
collector shall disburse to the proper official all portions of taxes not protested or not disputed
by the taxpayer and shall impound in a separate fund all portions of such taxes which are
protested or in dispute. Every taxpayer protesting the payment of current taxes under
subsection 1 of this section shall, within ninety days after filing [his] such taxpayer'sprotest,
commence an action against the collector by filing a petition for the recovery of the amount
protested in the circuit court of the county in which the collector maintains [his] the
collector's office. If any taxpayer so protesting [his] such taxpayer's taxes under subsection
1 of this section shall fail to commence an action in the circuit court for the recovery of the
taxes protested within the time prescribed in this subsection, such protest shall become null
and void and of no effect, and the collector shall then disburse to the proper official the taxes
impounded, and any interest earned thereon, as provided above in this subsection.
3. No action against the collector shall be commenced by any taxpayer who has,
effective for the current tax year, filed with the state tax commission or the circuit court a
timely and proper appeal of the assessment of the taxpayer's property. The portion of taxes in
dispute from an appeal of an assessment shall be impounded in a separate fund and the
commission in its decision and order issued under chapter 138 or the circuit court in its
judgment may order all or any part of such taxes refunded to the taxpayer, or may authorize
the collector to release and disburse all or any part of such taxes.

HB 2607 14
4. Trial of the action for recovery of taxes protested under subsection 1 of this section
in the circuit court shall be in the manner prescribed for nonjury civil proceedings, and, after
determination of the issues, the court shall make such orders as may be just and equitable to
refund to the taxpayer all or any part of the current taxes paid under protest, together with any
interest earned thereon, or to authorize the collector to release and disburse all or any part of
the impounded taxes, and any interest earned thereon, to the appropriate officials of the taxing
authorities. Either party to the proceedings may appeal the determination of the circuit court.
5. All the county collectors of taxes, and the collector of taxes in any city not within a
county, shall, upon written application of a taxpayer, refund or credit against the taxpayer's
tax liability in the following taxable year and subsequent consecutive taxable years until the
taxpayer has received credit in full for any real or personal property tax mistakenly or
erroneously levied against the taxpayer and collected in whole or in part by the collector.
Such application shall be filed within three years after the tax is mistakenly or erroneously
paid. The governing body, or other appropriate body or official of the county or city not
within a county, shall make available to the collector funds necessary to make refunds under
this subsection by issuing warrants upon the fund to which the mistaken or erroneous
payment has been credited, or otherwise.
6. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on any money paid in by the taxpayer
erroneously.
7. All protested taxes impounded under protest under subsection 1 of this section and
all disputed taxes impounded under notice as required by section 138.430 shall be invested by
the collector in the same manner as assets specified in section 30.260 for investment of state
moneys. A taxpayer who is entitled to a refund of protested or disputed taxes shall also
receive the interest earned on the investment thereof. If the collector is ordered to release and
disburse all or part of the taxes paid under protest or dispute to the proper official, such taxes
shall be disbursed along with the proportional amount of interest earned on the investment of
the taxes due the particular taxing authority.
8. Any taxing authority may request to be notified by the county collector of current
taxes paid under protest. Such request shall be in writing and submitted on or before
February first next following the delinquent date of current taxes paid under protest or
disputed, and the county collector shall provide such information on or before March first of
the same year to the requesting taxing authority of the taxes paid under protest and disputed
taxes which would be received by such taxing authority if the funds were not the subject of a
protest or dispute. Any taxing authority may apply to the circuit court of the county or city
not within a county in which a collector has impounded protested or disputed taxes under this
section and, upon a satisfactory showing that such taxing authority would receive such
impounded tax funds if they were not the subject of a protest or dispute and that such taxing

HB 2607 15
authority has the financial ability and legal capacity to repay such impounded tax funds in the
event a decision ordering a refund to the taxpayer is subsequently made, the circuit court shall
order, pendente lite, the disbursal of all or any part of such impounded tax funds to such
taxing authority. The circuit court issuing an order under this subsection shall retain
jurisdiction of such matter for further proceedings, if any, to compel restitution of such tax
funds to the taxpayer. In the event that any protested or disputed tax funds refunded to a
taxpayer were disbursed to a taxing authority under this subsection instead of being held and
invested by the collector under subsection 7 of this section, the taxpayer shall be entitled to
interest on all refunded tax funds, from the date that the disputed taxes were distributed to
a taxing authority through the date of the refund, at the [annual rate] rates calculated by
the state treasurer and applied by the director of revenue under section 32.068. This measure
of interest shall only apply to protested or disputed tax funds actually distributed to a taxing
authority pursuant to this subsection. In the event of a refund of protested or disputed tax
funds which remain impounded by the collector, the taxpayer shall instead be entitled to the
interest actually earned on those refunded impounded tax funds under subsection 7 of this
section. Any sovereign or official immunity otherwise applicable to the taxing authorities is
hereby waived for all purposes related to this subsection, and the taxpayer is expressly
authorized to seek an order enforcing this provision from the circuit court that originally
ordered the distribution of the protested or disputed funds, or directly from the state tax
commission, if the tax appeal that resulted in the refund was heard and determined by the
state tax commission.
9. No appeal filed from the circuit court's or state tax commission's determination
pertaining to the amount of refund shall stay any order of refund, but the decision filed by any
court of last review modifying that determination shall be binding on the parties, and the
decision rendered shall be complied with by the party affected by any modification within
ninety days of the date of such decision. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on any
additional award of refund, and the collector shall not receive any interest on any ordered
return of refund in whole or in part. In the event that a taxpayer is entitled to a refund, the
collector shall issue the refund to the taxpayer within thirty days of the date that the
circuit court's or state tax commission's determination establishing the amount of the
refund becomes final, and if the collector does not issue the refund within thirty days,
100 the taxpayer shall be entitled to interest on the refund at the rate established by the
101 director of revenue under section 32.065 for the period of time after the expiration of the
102 thirty days until the refund is issued, in addition to all other interest due to the taxpayer
103 under this section.
✔